enhu2.foma
### enhu2.foma ###

# Vowels
define Vowel [ a | á | ä | e | é | ë | i | í | o |ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő | A | Á | E | É | I | Í | O |Ó | U | Ú | Ü | Ű | Ö | Ő ];
define ConsNogln [ b | c | d | f | h | j | k | m | p | q | r | s | v | w | x | y | z | B | C | D | E | F | H | J | K | L | M | P | Q | R | S | V | W | X | Y | Z ];
define Cons [ b | c | č | ć | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z | B | C | Č | Ć | D | E | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | S | T | V | W | X | Y | Z ];
define yNoCons [ ConsNogln y | Vowel y | s z t y | ConsNogln Y | Vowel Y | S Z T Y ];
define yNoConstny [ Cons y | Vowel y | Cons Y | Vowel Y ];
define Vowelwithy [ Vowel | yNoCons ];
define Vowelwithyy [ Vowel | y | Y ];
define Vowelwithytny [ Vowel | yNoConstny ];
define Vowel1 [ a | e | í | o | ü | ö | A | E | Í | O | Ü | Ö ]; # w/o  á, é, i, ó, ő, ű, u, ú
define Vowel2 [ a | e | i | í | o | ü | ö | A | E | I | Í | O | Ü | Ö ]; # w/o  á, é, i, ó, ő, ű, u, ú
define Vowel1exc [ á | ä | é | ë | i | ó | ő | ű | u | ú | Á | É | I | Ó | Ő | Ű | U | Ú ];
define Vowel1withy [ Vowel1 | yNoCons ];
define Vowel2withy [ Vowel2 | yNoCons ];
define BackVowel [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú | A | Á | O | Ó | U | Ú ];
define FrontUnroundedVowel [ ä | e | é | ë | i | í | ü | ű | E | É | I | Í | Ü | Ű ];
define Front1UnroundedVowel [ ä | e | é | ë | i | í | E | É | I | Í  ];
define FrontRoundedVowel [ ö | ő | Ö | Ő ];
define Front1RoundedVowel [ ö | ő | ü | ű | Ö | Ő | Ü | Ű ];
define FrontVowel [ ä | e | é | ë | i | í | ü | ű | ö | ő | E | É | I | Í | Ü | Ű | Ö | Ő ];
define NonPlosivCons [ c | j | l | r | s | v | z | C | J | L | R | S | V | Z ];
define OppNonPlosivCons [ b | d | f | g | h | k | m | n | p | q | t | w | x | y | B | D | F | G | H | K | M | N | P | Q | T | W | X | Y ];
define DCons [ s z | z s | g y | t y | n y | l y | c s |  S Z | Z S | G Y | T Y | N Y | L Y | C S ];
define AccSingle [ j | l | n | r | s | z | J | L | N | R | S | Z ];
define Nodupy [ Vowel | ConsNogln ];
# előd (gróf zsiráf bab) 
define ConsJaje [ b | f  | B | F ];
define Consrd [ r d | n d ];
#abáltja holdja
define ConsAeJaje [ \Cons d | g | \s \c  h | s \c h | [ \s & \Vowel ] c h | k | l | m | n | p | r | \l t | v | g y | \z t y | \Cons D | G | \S \C  H | S \C H | [ \S & \Vowel ] C H | K | L | M | N | P | R | \L T | V | G Y | \Z T Y ];
# kénye reménye
define ConsAe [ c | j | s | z | x | s z | z s | c s | č | ć | [ s | Vowel ] c h | s z t y | n y | l y | C | J | S | Z | X | S Z | Z S | C S | Č | Ć | [ S | Vowel ] C H | S Z T Y | N Y | L Y ];

# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -ing/-ed (beg/begging)
define Etoee e -> é ||  _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* ; # \0: not zero kor & ként excluded
define Atoaa a -> á ||  _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* ; # \0: not zero kor & ként excluded
#derék
define Eetoe é -> e || .#. \%^* _ [ k ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} ]   ?*  ;
#bél
define EetoeAcc é -> e || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define EtoeeFgg e -> é || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define EetoePP é -> e || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#víz
define IitoiAcc3 í -> i || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define ItoiiFgg3 i -> í || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define IitoiPP3 í -> i || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#tűz
define UeuetoueAcc3 ű -> ü || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define UetoueueFgg3 ü -> ű || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define UeuetouePP3 ű -> ü || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#nyár
define AatoaAcc3 á -> a || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define AtoaaFgg3 a -> á || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define AatoaPP3 á -> a || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#kút, úr
define UutouAcc3 ú -> u || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define UtouuFgg3 u -> ú || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
# úr - ura
define UutouPP3 ú -> u || .#. \%^* _ NonPlosivCons+  "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}| "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s}| "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
# út, kút, lúd - lúdja  rúd ruduk
define UutouPP31 ú -> u || .#. \%^* _ OppNonPlosivCons+ %^  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}    | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p}  | "+" {cPossp3s}]   ?*  ;

define UuJtoj §J§ -> j || .#. \%^* ú OppNonPlosivCons+ %^ [ "+" {cPosss3s} ] %^ _ ?*  ;

define HarmRulejaje §AE1§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE1§ -> é // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE1§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ %^ [ 0 ] .o. 
                 §AE1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ %^ [ 0 ] ;
define HarmRulejajemagas §AE1magas§ -> é // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE1magas§ -> é // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE1magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ %^ [ 0 ] .o. 
                 §AE1magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ %^ [ 0 ] ;
define HarmRulejajemely §AE21§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE21§ -> á // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE21§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ %^ [ 0 ] .o. 
                 §AE21§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ %^ [ 0 ] ;
